Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-237.01
Reformation; procedure.

(1) An elected county fair board may be dissolved and reformed as either a county agricultural society or an appointed county fair board as provided in this section. An appointed county fair board may be dissolved and reformed as either a county agricultural society or an elected county fair board as provided in this section.

(2) An elected county fair board may by resolution request the county board to place the question of reformation of the county fair board before the registered voters of the county. The county board may on its own resolution place the question of reformation of an appointed county fair board before the registered voters of the county.

(3) Upon the adoption of a resolution under subsection (2) of this section, the county board shall call a general or special election on the question of reformation. If a majority of those voting on the question vote for reformation, the county board or the county fair board shall proceed with the statutory requirements to form the new entity.

(4) Any contract, action, rule, regulation, resolution, or other matter made, done, or performed by and within the scope of the previous board's authority shall remain in force and effect. Any real or personal property, rights, or credits and any duty, debt, or liability of the previous board shall automatically transfer to the new entity on the date of the entity's first meeting. Upon such transfer, the previous board shall automatically be dissolved. The previous board shall file notice of transfers and dissolutions with the register of deeds.

Laws 1999, LB 437, § 19.